Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB106.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5705 of Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5705. [(Reserved).] Food allergy awareness program.(a) Establishment.--The Department of Health shall establish a food allergy awareness program. The food allergy awareness program shall requ ire a p ublic eating or drinking place to comply with all of the following:(1) Prominently display a poster developed by the Department of Health under subsection (b) in the staff area that provides information on food allergy awareness.(2) Include on a food menu a notice to a customer of the customer's obligation to inform a server about the customer's food allergy.123456789101112131415161718 (b) Language.--The Department of Health, in consultation with the Food Allergy and Anaphylaxis Network, shall develop the poster required under subsection (a)(1) and approve the information on the poster.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0106PN0059 - 2 - 12345